Tennessee, session 114, HB2317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following new section:
39-13-536. Grooming a minor.
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Anti-Grooming
Act."
(b) The purpose of this section is to protect minors from sexual exploitation by
criminalizing grooming behavior and supplementing existing child protection laws.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Electronic communication" means a signal, message, writing, image,
sound, or data transmitted via wire, radio, internet, cellular technology, computer
applications, or an electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photo-optical system;
(2) "Grooming" means an act, pattern of acts, or communication by an
adult with a minor or mentally compromised individual, by any medium including
electronic communication, messaging, social media, text, telephone, or in
person, that is intended to establish trust, secrecy, emotional connection, or
control with a minor or mentally compromised individual with the intent to:
(A) Entice, lure, or solicit the minor or mentally compromised
individual to engage in sexual contact, simulated sexual contact, or
exploitation;
HB2317
012152
- 1 -

(B) Prepare, condition, or acclimate the minor or mentally
compromised individual for sexual contact or exploitation; or
(C) Facilitate the commission of a sexual offense against the
minor;
(3) "Mentally compromised individual" means a person of any
chronological age whose mental capacity is limited or compromised to that of a
child due to a medically diagnosed condition, including, but not limited to, autism
spectrum disorder, Down syndrome, schizophrenia, major depression,
debilitating anxiety, intellectual disability, or traumatic brain injury;
(4) "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age;
(5) "Sexual contact" means the same as defined in § 39-13-501; and
(6) "Simulated sexual contact" means any computer-generated or
otherwise altered depiction that appears to portray a minor or mentally
compromised individual engaged in sexual contact.
(d) A person commits the offense of grooming who knowingly communicates,
solicits, or interacts with a minor or mentally compromised individual with the intent to
commit, facilitate, or encourage sexual contact, simulated sexual contact, or sexual
exploitation of the minor or mentally compromised individual by any means, including
electronic communication or personal interaction.
(e)
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (e)(2)-(5), a violation of subsection
(d) is a Class E felony.
(2) A violation of subsection (d) is a Class A felony if the victim is a minor
under thirteen (13) years of age.
- 2 - 012152

(3) A violation of subsection (d) is a Class B felony if the victim is a
mentally compromised individual.
(4) A violation of subsection (d) is a Class C felony if the offender has a
prior conviction for a sexual offense or violent sexual offense, as those terms are
defined in § 40-39-202.
(5) A violation of subsection (d) is a Class D felony if the offender holds a
position of trust, authority, or supervision over the victim at the time of the
offense.
(f) It is not a defense to a violation of subsection (d) that the subject of the
offense is a law enforcement officer posing as a minor.
(g) A person is subject to prosecution in this state under this section for any
conduct that originates in this state, or for any conduct that originates by a person
located outside this state, where the person solicited the conduct of a minor located in
this state, or solicited a law enforcement officer posing as a minor located within this
state.
(h) This section is in addition to and does not supersede or limit other provisions
of law, including existing offenses involving sexual exploitation of a minor under § 39-17-
1003, child abuse and child neglect or endangerment under § 39-15-401, or other child
protection offenses.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-524(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(7) July 1, 2026, commits a violation of § 39-13-536, that involves an attempt to
meet, procure, or engage in sexual contact or simulated sexual contact with a minor or
mentally compromised individual following grooming.
- 3 - 012152

SECTION 3. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 012152